Massachusetts, session 194th, H2181.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 17B of chapter 147 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 4, the words “five days and to forty 
hours” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- 4 days and to 32 hours. 
SECTION 2. Section 17G of said chapter 147, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
striking out, in line 4, the words “five days and to forty hours” and inserting in place thereof the 
following words:- 4 days and to 32 hours. 
SECTION 3. Section 30A of chapter 149 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby 
amended by striking out, in line 3, the word “five” and inserting in place thereof the following 
figure:- 4. 
SECTION 4. Said section 30A of said chapter 149, as so appearing, is hereby further 
amended by striking out, in lines 5 and 6, the words “thirty-seven and one half hours, except in 
the case of part-time employment, nor more than forty hours” and inserting in place thereof the 

of 2 13 following words:- 29 ½ hours, except in the case of part-time employment, nor more than 32 
hours. 
SECTION 5. Section 30B of said chapter 149, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
striking out, in line 2, the word “forty” and inserting in place thereof the following figure:- 32. 
SECTION 6. Section 30C of said chapter 149, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
striking out, in line 3, the word “forty” and inserting in place thereof the following figure:- 32. 
SECTION 7. Said section 30C of said chapter 149, as so appearing, is hereby further 
amended by striking out, in line 7, the word “five” and inserting in place thereof the following 
figure:- 4. 
SECTION 8. Section 33A of said chapter 149, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
striking out, in line 10, the words “five days and forty hours” and inserting in place thereof the 
following words:- 4 days and 32 hours. 
SECTION 9. Section 33B of said chapter 149, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
striking out, in line 9, the words “five days and forty hours” and inserting in place thereof the 
following words:- 4 days and 32 hours. 
SECTION 10. Said chapter 149, as so appearing, is hereby amended by inserting after 
section 51B the following section:- 
Section 51C. Notwithstanding any special or general law to the contrary, no employer 
shall employ any employee for a workweek longer than 32 hours unless such employee receives 
compensation for their employment in excess of the hours above specified at a rate not less than 
1½ times the regular rate at which they are employed.